District of Columbia statutes.
1-1061.17

Prohibition of nonsubstantive requirements.

(a)

If a voter’s mistake or omission in the completion of a document under this subchapter does not prevent determining whether a covered voter is eligible to vote, the mistake or omission shall not invalidate the document. Failure to satisfy a nonsubstantive requirement, such as using paper or envelopes of a specified size or weight, shall not invalidate a document submitted under this subchapter. In a write-in ballot authorized by this subchapter or in a vote for a write-in candidate on a regular ballot, if the intention of the voter is discernable under the District’s uniform definition of what constitutes a vote, an abbreviation, misspelling, or other minor variation in the form of the name of a candidate or a political party shall be accepted as a valid vote.

(b)

Notarization is not required for the execution of a document under this subchapter. An authentication, other than the declaration specified in § 1-1061.13 or the declaration on the federal postcard application and federal write-in absentee ballot, is not required for the execution of a document under this subchapter. The declaration and any information in the declaration may be compared with information on file to ascertain the validity of the document.

June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-137, § 117, 59 DCR 2542

History

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 17 of the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act.

Editor's Notes